Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 43 Cabinet-Level Departments of the Executive Branch
25-43-202. State entities transferred to Department of Agriculture.

As provided in §§ 25-38-206 and 25-38-211, the following state entities, or parts thereof, are transferred to the Department of Agriculture by a cabinet-level department transfer:

The Abandoned Pesticide Advisory Board, created under § 8-7-1204;

The Arkansas Agriculture Board, created under § 25-38-207;

The Arkansas Agriculture Department, created under § 25-38-202 [repealed], and now to be known as the “Department of Agriculture”;

The Arkansas Bureau of Standards, created under § 4-18-301 et seq.;

The Arkansas Boll Weevil Eradication Committee;

The Arkansas Farm Mediation Office, created under § 2-7-201;

The Arkansas Fire Ant Advisory Board, created under § 2-16-701;

The Arkansas Forestry Commission, created under § 15-31-101;

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, created under § 2-33-101;

The Arkansas Milk Stabilization Board, created under § 2-10-103;

The Arkansas Natural Resources Commission, created under § 15-20-201;

The Arkansas Seed Arbitration Committee, created under § 2-23-104;

The Arkansas State Board of Registration for Foresters, created under § 17-31-201;

The Arkansas State Board of Registration for Professional Soil Classifiers, created under § 17-47-201;

The Arkansas Unpaved Roads Program, created under § 14-305-104;

The Commission on Water Well Construction, created under § 17-50-201;

The Litter Utilization Committee, created under § 15-20-1110;

The Private Wetland and Riparian Zone Creation, Restoration, and Conservation Committee, created under § 26-51-1503(3);

The Ouachita River Commission, created under § 15-23-803;

The Red River Compact Commission, created under § 15-23-501;

The State Plant Board, created under § 2-16-206;

The Veterinary Medical Examining Board, created under § 17-101-201; and

The Wetlands Technical Advisory Committee, created under § 15-22-1003.

If there is a conflict between the cabinet-level department transfers of the state entities listed in subdivisions (a)(1)-(23) of this section and either the transfer of these same state entities under § 25-38-211 or the transfer of their respective personnel, administrative functions, and human resource and accounting operations under § 25-38-206, then the transfer provisions under §§ 25-38-206 and 25-38-211 shall apply.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Agriculture under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Agriculture under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Agriculture under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Agriculture in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2020, No. 180, § 53, provided: “SHARED SERVICES.

“(a)(1)(A)The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and operating expenses by the Department of Commerce.

“(B)Upon prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council, or if meeting in Legislative Session the Joint Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account appropriation section of this act and the transfer of positions to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“(2)The transfer authority provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for efficiencies and to eliminate duplication of services are limited only to those services that are provided for multiple divisions of a department, including without limitation to administration, human resources, procurement, communications, fleet operations, and information services.

“(3)The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts authorized for the department.

“(b)(1)Each department utilizing the Shared Services Paying Account section or Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act shall submit a report to be included in the Budget Manuals for hearings, conducted by the General Assembly, listing all shared services transfers of positions, funds, and appropriation under this section, which shall be submitted as instructed by the Department of Finance and Administration — Office of Budget for uniformity.

“(2)A report submitted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

“(A)The position number, authorized position title, class code, grade, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the position being transferred to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act; and

“(B)The fund center, appropriation, appropriation amount, commitment item or items, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the fund or appropriation being transferred to the Shared Services Paying Account.

“(c)(1)It is the intent of the Ninety-Second General Assembly that the authority under this section to transfer positions is intended for use for the time period prior to Fiscal Year 2022 to allow cabinet-level departments to establish a centralized Regular Salaries — Shared Services section, with the recommendation that the position transfer authority granted under this section be discontinued after that time.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall bring the recommendation in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the attention of the chairs conducting the 2021 Regular Session pre-session budget hearings, the chairs of the Special Language Subcommittee, and the members of the Special Language Subcommittee during pre-session budget hearings.

“(d)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a cabinet-level department each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act or acts and establishing authorized positions and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the cabinet-level departments created under Acts 2019, No. 910, may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided as authorized under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“(e)The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of passage through June 30, 2021”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
3.

Subchapter 3

— Department of Commerce

25-43-301. Department of Commerce.

There is created a Department of Commerce as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
126.

25-43-302. State entities transferred to Department of Commerce.

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Commerce by a cabinet-level department transfer:

The Adult Education Section of the Department of Career Education, and now to be known as the “Adult Education Section”, created under § 25-43-305;

The Arkansas Deaf and Hearing Impaired Telecommunications Services Corporation, created under § 25-29-101;

The Arkansas Department of Aeronautics, created under § 27-115-101, and now to be known as the “Division of Aeronautics”;

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority, created under § 15-5-201;

The Arkansas Economic Development Commission, created under § 25-11-101;

The Arkansas Economic Development Council, created under §§ 15-4-201 and 25-11-102;

The Arkansas Housing Trust Fund Advisory Committee, created under § 15-5-1706;

Arkansas Rehabilitation Services, created under § 6-52-101;

The Arkansas Rural Development Commission, created under § 15-6-104;

The Arkansas Waterways Commission, created under § 15-23-201;

The Arkansas Wine Producers Council, created under § 3-5-701;

The Arkansas Workforce Development Board, created under § 15-4-3704;

The Board of Review, created under § 11-10-523;

The Board of the Division of State Services for the Blind, created under § 25-10-205;

The Career Education and Workforce Development Board, created under § 25-30-101;

The Department of Workforce Services, created under § 11-10-301, and now to be known as the “Division of Workforce Services”;

The Division of Minority and Women-owned Business Enterprise of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, created under § 15-4-304;

The Division of Science and Technology of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, created under § 15-3-103;

The Division of State Services for the Blind, created under § 25-10-201;

The Governor's Commission on People with Disabilities, created under § 20-14-202;

The Office of Skills Development, created under § 25-30-109;

The State Bank Department, created under § 23-46-201;

The State Banking Board, created under § 23-46-301;

The State Board of Embalmers, Funeral Directors, Cemeteries, and Burial Services, created under § 23-61-1102;

The State Insurance Department, created under § 23-61-101; and

The State Securities Department, created under the Arkansas Securities Act, § 23-42-101 et seq.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Commerce under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Commerce under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Commerce under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Commerce in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions or employees of the department as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the department.

The secretary may, unless otherwise provided by law:

Hire department personnel;

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department; and

Be appointed as the director or the administrative or executive head of any state entity under the administrative control of the department if the secretary also meets all statutory requirements for the position.

If the secretary meets all statutory requirements for the respective position, the secretary may serve as the interim or acting:

Insurance Commissioner;

Bank Commissioner; or

Securities Commissioner.

The secretary cannot be permanently appointed to any of the positions listed in subdivision (f)(1) of this section.

The secretary shall delegate the authority to hire employees and to make employment contracts for work performed to the following officers for their respective departments:

The Insurance Commissioner;

The Bank Commissioner; and

The Securities Commissioner.

The State Insurance Department, State Bank Department, and State Securities Department shall be subject to all executive orders by the Governor instituting a hiring freeze or restriction applicable to all cabinet-level departments.

When exercising his or her duties, the secretary shall work in consultation with the following officers with regard to their respective departments:

The Insurance Commissioner;

The Bank Commissioner; and

The Securities Commissioner.

As used in subdivision (g)(3) of this section, “consultation” means coordinating with, giving input, reviewing, and recommending, but shall not require approval or consent.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2020, No. 83, § 47, provided: “SHARED SERVICES.

“(a)(1)(A)The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and operating expenses by the Department of Corrections — Division of Correction.

“(B)Upon prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council, or if meeting in Legislative Session the Joint Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account appropriation section of this act and the transfer of positions to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“(2)The transfer authority provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for efficiencies and to eliminate duplication of services are limited only to those services that are provided for multiple divisions of a department, including without limitation to administration, human resources, procurement, communications, fleet operations, and information services.

“(3)The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts authorized for the department.

“(b)(1)Each department utilizing the Shared Services Paying Account section or Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act shall submit a report to be included in the Budget Manuals for hearings, conducted by the General Assembly, listing all shared services transfers of positions, funds, and appropriation under this section, which shall be submitted as instructed by the Department of Finance and Administration — Office of Budget for uniformity.

“(2)A report submitted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

“(A)The position number, authorized position title, class code, grade, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the position being transferred to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act; and

“(B)The fund center, appropriation, appropriation amount, commitment item or items, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the fund or appropriation being transferred to the Shared Services Paying Account.

“(c)(1)It is the intent of the Ninety-Second General Assembly that the authority under this section to transfer positions is intended for use for the time period prior to Fiscal Year 2022 to allow cabinet-level departments to establish a centralized Regular Salaries — Shared Services section, with the recommendation that the position transfer authority granted under this section be discontinued after that time.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall bring the recommendation in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the attention of the chairs conducting the 2021 Regular Session pre-session budget hearings, the chairs of the Special Language Subcommittee, and the members of the Special Language Subcommittee during pre-session budget hearings.

“(d)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a cabinet-level department each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act or acts and establishing authorized positions and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the cabinet-level departments created under Acts 2019, No. 910, may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided as authorized under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“(e)The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of passage through June 30, 2021”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Is affiliated with the department;

Shall be the governing authority of the department; and

Shall perform all functions with respect to the management and control of the department as contemplated by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33.

No provision of the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 shall abridge, diminish, or curtail, in any respect, the authority vested in the board to govern and supervise the administration of the board's responsibilities prior to July 1, 2019, including without limitation governing and supervising the administration of the state correctional institutions.

The department shall:

The department shall:

The administrative functions of the following state entities are transferred to the Department of Corrections by a cabinet-level department transfer:

The Department of Correction, created under § 12-27-101, and now to be known as the “Division of Correction”;

The Office of Criminal Detention Facilities, created under § 12-26-103;

The Parole Board, created under § 16-93-201; and

The State Council for Interstate Commission for Adult Offender Supervision, created under § 12-51-104.

The board is not required to appoint the nominee under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

The secretary may perform all duties to administer the Department of Corrections, subject to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33, including without limitation:

Statutory duties; or

Rules, orders, or directives promulgated or issued by the state entities transferred to or established within the department;

Hire department personnel; and

Perform or assign duties assigned to the department.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2020, No. 153, § 28, provided: “SHARED SERVICES.

“(a)(1)(A)The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and operating expenses by the Department of Education.

“(B)Upon prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council, or if meeting in Legislative Session the Joint Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account appropriation section of this act and the transfer of positions to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“(2)The transfer authority provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for efficiencies and to eliminate duplication of services are limited only to those services that are provided for multiple divisions of a department, including without limitation to administration, human resources, procurement, communications, fleet operations, and information services.

“(3)The transfer authority provided to the department in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be used to make transfers only within the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts authorized for the department.

“(b)(1)Each department utilizing the Shared Services Paying Account section or Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act shall submit a report to be included in the Budget Manuals for hearings, conducted by the General Assembly, listing all shared services transfers of positions, funds, and appropriation under this section, which shall be submitted as instructed by the Department of Finance and Administration — Office of Budget for uniformity.

“(2)A report submitted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall include the following:

“(A)The position number, authorized position title, class code, grade, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the position being transferred to the Regular Salaries — Shared Services section of this act; and

“(B)The fund center, appropriation, appropriation amount, commitment item or items, business area, and name of the division, section, or unit for the fund or appropriation being transferred to the Shared Services Paying Account.

“(c)(1)It is the intent of the Ninety-Second General Assembly that the authority under this section to transfer positions is intended for use for the time period prior to Fiscal Year 2022 to allow cabinet-level departments to establish a centralized Regular Salaries — Shared Services section, with the recommendation that the position transfer authority granted under this section be discontinued after that time.

“(2)The Bureau of Legislative Research shall bring the recommendation in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the attention of the chairs conducting the 2021 Regular Session pre-session budget hearings, the chairs of the Special Language Subcommittee, and the members of the Special Language Subcommittee during pre-session budget hearings.

“(d)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a cabinet-level department each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act or acts and establishing authorized positions and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the cabinet-level departments created under Acts 2019, No. 910, may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided as authorized under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“(e)The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of passage through June 30, 2021”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
126.

25-43-303. Secretary of the Department of Commerce — Definition.

The executive head of the Department of Commerce shall be the Secretary of the Department of Commerce.

The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Each division of the department shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary, unless otherwise provided by law.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
126.

25-43-304. Compliance with federal law.

All employees of the Department of Commerce shall be assigned and perform assigned duties in compliance with all applicable federal laws, regulations, and rules, including without limitation all rules related to the State Securities Department, State Bank Department, and the State Insurance Department.

To ensure compliance with federal law, only Department of Commerce employees who are dedicated employees of the State Bank Department shall:

Conduct examinations of financial institutions;

Handle and process reports of examinations of financial institutions; and

Handle confidential financial institution information.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 126.

25-43-305. Adult Education Section.

There is created within the Division of Workforce Services an Adult Education Section.

The Secretary of the Department of Commerce may delegate any duties and responsibilities to the section.

The secretary may employ the personnel necessary to administer the section.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
126.

Subchapter 4

— Department of Corrections

25-43-401. Department of Corrections.

There is created the Department of Corrections as a cabinet-level department.

(1)The Board of Corrections:

Maintain and administer real property on behalf of each state entity transferred under this chapter if the real property is not under the supervision and control of the board; and

Maintain and administer all personal property on behalf of each state entity transferred under this chapter.

Assist the board with developing a biennial budget and annual, quarterly, and monthly fiscal plans for the operation of the board and assist the board in complying with the budget and fiscal policies promulgated by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections;

Assist the board with complying with the general guidelines, polices, and rules of the department with respect to personnel and personnel policies, records, purchasing, bookkeeping, and other administrative procedures prescribed by the department;

Consult with the board regarding personnel decisions and staffing; and

Coordinate the policies promulgated by the board for the administration of personnel and personnel records to assure that all employee records and personnel records of the board conform to the personnel policies and practices of the department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
644.

25-43-402. State entities transferred to Department of Corrections.

The Arkansas Sentencing Commission, created under §16-90-802;

The Corrections School System, created under §12-29-301;

The criminal detention facility review committees, under §12-26-101;

The Department of Community Correction, created under §12-27-124, and now to be known as the “Division of Community Correction”;

Unless otherwise provided by law, a cabinet-level department transfer under subsection (a) of this section includes all state entities under a state entity transferred to the Department of Corrections under subsection (a) of this section, including without limitation a division, office, program, or other unit of a state entity transferred to the Department of Corrections under subsection (a) of this section.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a state entity whose administrative functions have been transferred to the Department of Corrections under subsection (a) of this section shall otherwise continue to exercise the duties of the state entity under the administration of the cabinet-level Department of Corrections in the same manner as before the creation of the cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
644.

25-43-403. Secretary of the Department of Corrections.

The executive head of the Department of Corrections shall be the Secretary of the Department of Corrections.

(1)The Governor shall nominate to the Board of Corrections a candidate for secretary, subject to confirmation by the Senate.

(A)The Board of Corrections shall appoint the secretary who shall serve at the pleasure of the Board of Corrections.

Delegate to the employees of the Department of Corrections any of the powers or duties of the department required to administer the:

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
644.

Subchapter 5

— Department of Education

25-43-501. Department of Education.

There is created the Department of Education as a cabinet-level department.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
1030.